Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-2101
Act, how cited.

Sections 69-2101 to 69-2119 shall be known and may be cited as the Consumer Rental Purchase Agreement Act.

Laws 1989, LB 681, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 111, § 1.